Hawaii statutes.
[§482P-5] Infringement of right; use
without consent; profit or not for profit. Except as provided in section 482P-7,
any person who uses or authorizes the use of a living or deceased individual's
or personality's name, voice, signature, or likeness, on or in goods,
merchandise, or services entered into commerce in this State, or for purposes
of advertising products, merchandise, goods, or services, or for purposes of
fund-raising or solicitation of donations, or if any person disseminates or
publishes advertisements in this State that contain a living or deceased
individual's or personality's name, voice, signature, or likeness, without
express or implied consent of the owner of the right, has infringed a publicity
right under this chapter. An infringement may occur under this section without
regard to whether the use or activity is for profit or not for profit. [L Sp
2009, c 28, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next